Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1214
Delinquencies; Attorney General; county attorney; injunction.

The Attorney General or the county attorney of the county in which the uranium is located may file a petition in the district court of such county and, upon such filing, the district court shall have the power to restrain by injunction any person from continuing to sever such uranium while delinquent in any report or the payment of any tax, penalty, or cost required by sections 57-1201 to 57-1214.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 26.